Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 1. Officers of the Legislature.

Sec. 24.10.010.
Legislative officers.

The senate shall elect from its membership a presiding officer who shall be called the “President of the Senate” and the house of representatives shall elect from its membership a presiding officer who shall be called the “Speaker of the House of Representatives.” The presiding officer of each house shall have such powers, duties, and prerogatives as may be assigned them under the rules of the legislature and by law.

History.

(§ 16(1) ch 157 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 47 SLA 1961)

Sec. 24.10.020.
Presiding officers pro tempore.

The majority leader of each house serves as the presiding officer pro tempore of that house if the elected presiding officer resigns, becomes incapacitated, or dies. The presiding officer pro tempore is authorized to perform the duties of that office until the house elects a regular presiding officer, and the election shall be made the order of business of the house at the earliest appropriate hour.

History.

(§ 16(1) ch 157 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 47 SLA 1961)

Sec. 24.10.030.
Chief clerk and senate secretary.

Each house shall select from outside its membership a person of known stenographic and administrative ability to serve as chief administrative clerk; a chief clerk in the house of representatives and a secretary in the senate. When nominated and elected in conformity with the uniform rules, they continue to serve for the duration of the legislature at the pleasure of the house to which assigned. Pending the organization of a new legislature, they may continue to serve at the request and direction of the legislative council until their respective houses formally reappoint or replace them. The chief clerk and senate secretary are responsible for the performance of duties provided for by law, the uniform rules, and orders of the house. They may be requested to report to the legislative council for duty for a period not to exceed two weeks immediately preceding the convening of the session and shall remain at the capital until the completion of their work is determined by the director of the council.

History.

(§ 16(2) ch 157 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 47 SLA 1961; am § 2 ch 100 SLA 1963)

Sec. 24.10.040.
Legislative fiscal officer.

The fiscal officer of the Legislative Affairs Agency serves as the fiscal officer of the legislature.

History.

(§ 16(3) ch 157 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 47 SLA 1961; am § 35 ch 32 SLA 1971)

Sec. 24.10.050.
Other officers.

Provision for the election or appointment of other officers for either or both houses may be made in the rules.

History.

(§ 16(4) ch 157 SLA 1959)